lib/uk_UA.aff
SFX z Y 149
SFX z а ич [^тс]а
SFX z а ича [^тс]а
SFX z а ичу [^тс]а
SFX z а ичеві [^тс]а
SFX z а ичем [^тс]а
SFX z а ичі [^тс]а
SFX z 0 івна [^впрнйуеаоіиїєяюь]
SFX z 0 івни [^впрнйуеаоіиїєяюь]
SFX z 0 івні [^впрнйуеаоіиїєяюь]
SFX z 0 івну [^впрнйуеаоіиїєяюь]
SFX z 0 івною [^впрнйуеаоіиїєяюь]
SFX z 0 івно [^впрнйуеаоіиїєяюь]
SFX z ін онович и[мх]ін
SFX z ін оновича и[мх]ін
SFX z ін оновичу и[мх]ін
SFX z ін оновичеві и[мх]ін
SFX z ін оновичем и[мх]ін
SFX z ін оновичі и[мх]ін
SFX z ін онівна и[мх]ін
SFX z ін онівни и[мх]ін
SFX z ін онівні и[мх]ін
SFX z ін онівну и[мх]ін
SFX z ін онівною и[мх]ін
SFX z ін онівно и[мх]ін
SFX z іп опович іп
SFX z іп оповича іп
SFX z іп оповичу іп
SFX z іп оповичеві іп
SFX z іп оповичем іп
SFX z іп оповичі іп
SFX z іп опівна іп
SFX z іп опівни іп
SFX z іп опівні іп
SFX z іп опівну іп
SFX z іп опівною іп
SFX z іп опівно іп
SFX z ір орович ір
SFX z ір оровича ір
SFX z ір оровичу ір
SFX z ір оровичеві ір
SFX z ір оровичем ір
SFX z ір оровичі ір
SFX z ір орівна ір
SFX z ір орівни ір
SFX z ір орівні ір
SFX z ір орівну ір
SFX z ір орівною ір
SFX z ір орівно ір
SFX z а ович [тс]а
SFX z а овича [тс]а
SFX z а овичу [тс]а
SFX z а овичеві [тс]а
SFX z а овичем [тс]а
SFX z а овичі [тс]а
SFX z ь івна ь
SFX z ь івни ь
SFX z ь івні ь
SFX z ь івну ь
SFX z ь івною ь
SFX z ь івно ь
SFX z а івна а
SFX z а івни а
SFX z а івні а
SFX z а івну а
SFX z а івною а
SFX z а івно а
SFX z 0 ович [^и]мін
SFX z 0 овича [^и]мін
SFX z 0 овичу [^и]мін
SFX z 0 овичеві [^и]мін
SFX z 0 овичем [^и]мін
SFX z 0 овичі [^и]мін
SFX z 0 івна [^и]мін
SFX z 0 івни [^и]мін
SFX z 0 івні [^и]мін
SFX z 0 івну [^и]мін
SFX z 0 івною [^и]мін
SFX z 0 івно [^и]мін
SFX z я іч [^і]я
SFX z я іча [^і]я
SFX z я ічу [^і]я
SFX z я ічеві [^і]я
SFX z я ічем [^і]я
SFX z я ічі [^і]я
SFX z я івна [^і]я
SFX z я івни [^і]я
SFX z я івні [^і]я
SFX z я івну [^і]я
SFX z я івною [^і]я
SFX z я івно [^і]я
SFX z я йович ія
SFX z я йовича ія
SFX z я йовичу ія
SFX z я йовичеві ія
SFX z я йовичем ія
SFX z я ївна ія
SFX z я ївни ія
SFX z я ївні ія
SFX z я ївну ія
SFX z я ївною ія
SFX z я ївно ія
SFX z й ївна й
SFX z й ївни й
SFX z й ївні й
SFX z й ївну й
SFX z й ївною й
SFX z й ївно й
SFX z 0 ович [^впрнуеаоіиїєяю]
SFX z 0 овича [^впрнуеаоіиїєяю]
SFX z 0 овичу [^впрнуеаоіиїєяю]
SFX z 0 овичеві [^впрнуеаоіиїєяю]
SFX z 0 овичем [^впрнуеаоіиїєяю]
SFX z 0 овичі [^впрнуеаоіиїєяю]
SFX z ів ович ів
SFX z ів овича ів
SFX z ів овичу ів
SFX z ів овичеві ів
SFX z ів овичем ів
SFX z ів овичі ів
SFX z ів івна ів
SFX z ів івни ів
SFX z ів івні ів
SFX z ів івну ів
SFX z ів івною ів
SFX z ів івно ів
SFX z 0 ович [^і][впрн]
SFX z 0 овича [^і][впрн]
SFX z 0 овичу [^і][впрн]
SFX z 0 овичеві [^і][впрн]
SFX z 0 овичем [^і][впрн]
SFX z 0 овичі [^і][впрн]
SFX z 0 івна [^і][впрн]
SFX z 0 івни [^і][впрн]
SFX z 0 івні [^і][впрн]
SFX z 0 івну [^і][впрн]
SFX z 0 івною [^і][впрн]
SFX z 0 івно [^і][впрн]
SFX z о ович о
SFX z о овича о
SFX z о овичу о
SFX z о овичеві о
SFX z о овичем о
SFX z о овичі о
SFX z о івна о
SFX z о івни о
SFX z о івні о
SFX z о івну о
SFX z о івною о
SFX z о івно о
SFX { Y 17
SFX { 0 му ти
SFX { 0 меш ти
SFX { 0 ме ти
SFX { 0 мемо ти
SFX { 0 мем ти
SFX { 0 мете ти
SFX { 0 муть ти
SFX { ся муся тися
SFX { ся мусь тися
SFX { ся мешся тися
SFX { ся меться тися
SFX { ся мемося тися
SFX { ся мемось тися
SFX { ся мемся тися
SFX { ся метеся тися
SFX { ся метесь тися
SFX { ся муться тися
SFX | Y 15
SFX | іб ебе іб
SFX | ів еве ів
SFX | іг еге іг
SFX | іж еже іж
SFX | іл еле іл
SFX | ін ене ін
SFX | іп епе іп
SFX | ір ере ір
SFX | іс есе іс
SFX | іт ете іт
SFX | іш еше іш
SFX | ідь еде ідь
SFX | іль еле іль
SFX | інь ене інь
SFX | їв єве їв
SFX } Y 1
SFX } ти но ти
